Illinois, session 104th, HB1522.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1901)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Regulatory Sunset Act.9(Source: P.A. 90-580, eff. 5-21-98.)